Massachusetts, session 194th, S1006.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Notwithstanding any general or special law or any rule or regulation to the contrary,
chapter 23B of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after section 30 the following
new section:-
Section 31 (a). As used in this section, the following words shall have the following
meanings unless the context clearly requires otherwise:-
“Youth Serving Organization,” an organization that provides recreational, cultural,
charitable, social, or other activities or services for persons under 18 years of age, and is exempt
from federal income tax.
of 3

“Out of School Time Program,” an established licensed or non-licensed daily week day
program for persons under 18 years of age offered by a youth serving organization, school
system, or municipality, offered before and after school and during school vacation.
“Summer Programs,” an established licensed or non-licensed daily week day program for
persons under 18 years of age offered by a youth serving organization, school system, or
municipality, offered during the months of summer vacation.
(b) Subject to appropriation, the Department shall create a program to address the needs
of children, ages five through fourteen, residing in the Emergency Assistance program, as
defined by 760 CMR 67.00. The program shall from herein be known as the Home Works
Program. The Home Works Program shall allow out of school time and summer programs to
apply for a certain number of slots funded by the Department. Each slot shall be used to provide
out of school time and summer programming for an eligible participant, including transportation
to and from the program. Each Home Works Program slot shall be funded at an adequate amount
not less than 75% of local market value for out of school time and summer services and will
cover transportation costs associated with transporting participants to and from the program.
The Department shall keep a waitlist of eligible program participants from which the out
of school time and camp programs may draw from to fill their slots.
(c) Licensed and non-licensed out of school time and summer programs may apply for
program slots through the Department. Said slots shall be allotted proportionally by the areas in
the Commonwealth that have the highest number of children residing in the Emergency
Assistance Program and through the out of school time or summer program’s capacity. However,
a program shall not be limited in the amount of allowable slots it accepts. Said out of school time
of 3

and summer programs shall be able to meet the transportation requirements set out by the
Department before applying for slots. These include, but are not limited to, the capacity to
transport participants from their current place of residence and back to said place within the time
frame set out by the Department of Early Education and Care in 606 CMR 7.13.
If the participant is no longer eligible to remain in the Home Works program, the out of
school time or summer program may draw another eligible participant from the Home Works
waitlist to fill the slot.
If said program is unable to meet the transportation requirements set out by the
Department, said program may work with the Emergency Assistance residence to provide out of
school time and summer programs on site or at another facility deemed acceptable by the
Department of Housing and Community Development.
(d) Said out of school time programs and summer programs shall require that all staff
members in employment and direct care of children in the program have completed satisfactorily
a criminal background check that includes a comprehensive check of the National Sexual
Offender Registry.
The Home Works Program shall not be funded through the already existing funds in the
Emergency Assistance program.
The Department shall promulgate regulations in accordance with this section within six
months of the passage of this act.
of 3